New York, session 2025-2026, A5030.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subject to the provisions of this act, the city of Pough- 2 keepsie is hereby authorized, acting by and through its governing body, 3 and upon such terms and conditions as determined by such governing body, 4 to discontinue the use as parkland and alienate the lands described in 5 section three of this act, for the purpose of constructing an emergency 6 communications tower on such lands for use by the city of Poughkeepsie. 7 § 2. The authorization contained in section one of this act shall only 8 be effective on the condition that, the city of Poughkeepsie dedicate an 9 amount equal to or greater than the fair market value of the parklands 10 being discontinued toward the acquisition of new parklands and/or capi- 11 tal improvements to existing park and recreational facilities. 12 § 3. The parklands authorized by section one of this act to be discon- 13 tinued as parkland is described as follows: 14 ALL THAT CERTAIN PARCEL OF LAND SITUATE IN THE CITY OF POUGHKEEPSIE, 15 COUNTY OF DUTCHESS AND STATE OF NEW YORK AND BEING A PORTION OF LAND 16 CONVEYED TO THE CITY OF POUGHKEEPSIE, A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION BY LIBER 17 200 AT PAGE 239, LIBER 200 AT PAGE 241 AND LIBER 200 AT PAGE 243 AND 18 RECORDED IN THE DUTCHESS COUNTY CLERK'S OFFICE BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS 19 FOLLOWS: 20 COMMENCING AT A POINT, SAID POINT BEING LOCATED ON THE EASTERLY BOUNDS 21 OF NORTH CLINTON STREET, SAID POINT BEING THE NORTHWESTERLY CORNER OF 22 TAX PARCEL 6162-63-327371-0000, BEING OWNED NOW OR FORMERLY BY DEBORAH 23 A. WHITTON, THENCE FROM SAID POINT OF COMMENCEMENT ALONG SAID EASTERLY 24 BOUNDS OF NORTH CLINTON STREET, N. 11° 02' 43" E., 402.00' TO A POINT, 25 THEN FROM SAID POINT THROUGH THE SAID LANDS OF THE CITY OF POUGHKEEPSIE, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01983-01-5 A. 5030 2 1 A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION AND PARALLEL WITH THE NORTH LINE OF SAID TAX 2 PARCEL 6162-63-327371-0000, S 81° 04' 59" E, 979.30', MORE OR LESS TO 3 THE NORTHEASTERLY CORNER OF AN EXISTING TELECOMMUNICATION COMPOUND AND 4 THE POINT AND PLACE OF BEGINNING, THENCE FROM SAID POINT AND PLACE OF 5 BEGINNING THE FOLLOWING EIGHT (8) COURSES AND DISTANCES: 6 1) S. 73° 24' 59" E., 21.00', THENCE 7 2) N. 16° 35' 01" E., 45.60', THENCE 8 3) N. 43° 35' 01" E., 25.00', THENCE 9 4) N. 46° 24' 59" W., 20.00', THENCE 10 5) S. 43° 35' 01" W., 33.50', THENCE 11 6) N. 73° 24' 59" W., 33.34', THENCE 12 7) S. 16° 35' 01" W., 59.56', THENCE 13 8) S. 73° 24' 59" E., 29.00' TO THE POINT AND PLACE OF BEGINNING, 14 CONTAINING 3,447.03 SQ. FEET, OR 0.079 ACRES MORE OR LESS. 15 § 4. In the event that the city of Poughkeepsie received any funding 16 support or assistance from the federal government for the purchase, 17 maintenance, or improvement of the parklands set forth in section three 18 of this act, the discontinuance and alienation of such parklands author- 19 ized by the provisions of this act shall not occur until the city of 20 Poughkeepsie has complied with any federal requirements pertaining to 21 the alienation or conversion of parklands, including satisfying the 22 secretary of the interior that the alienation or conversion complies 23 with all conditions which the secretary of the interior deems necessary 24 to assure the substitution of other lands shall be equivalent in fair 25 market value and usefulness to the lands being alienated or converted. 26 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.